Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6055.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2c. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, the attorney general shall provide an annual written notice to every dealer that explains the dealer's obligations under this act. (2) A written notice under subsection (1) must include all of the following: (a) A detailed description of the dealer's responsibilities under this act, including the dealer's obligation under section 2b. (b) Contact information for the consumer protection division in the department of attorney general for any questions or complaints. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04682'25) or House Bill No. 6054 (request no. H04682'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.